Connecticut, session 2026, SB00516.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) (1) To evaluate the effectiveness
2 of the antifraud and enforcement measures enacted pursuant to public
3 act 26-2, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall, not later than
4 February 15, 2027, determine for calendar year 2026 the state-wide
5 average redemption rate of all beverage containers, as defined in section
6 22a-243 of the general statutes, and the redemption rate of beverage
7 containers for each deposit initiator. If the commissioner determines
8 that the state-wide redemption rate or the redemption rate of any
9 deposit initiator was more than one hundred per cent for calendar year
10 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (a)
11 of section 22a-244 of the general statutes, the refund value under said
12 subdivision shall be reduced to five cents, effective July 1, 2027, or as
13 soon as practicable thereafter for the beverage industry to implement
14 the change.
SB516 / File No. 701 1

SB516 File No. 701
15 (2) The refund value shall remain at five cents until such time as the
16 commissioner certifies, based on irrefutable evidence, that one hundred
17 per cent of the beverage containers redeemed in this state are beverage
18 containers originally sold in this state.
19 (b) Each deposit initiator that submitted a quarterly report pursuant
20 to section 22a-245a of the general statutes that properly reported a
21 negative balance in such deposit initiator's special account during the
22 fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, where such negative
23 balance resulted from the overredemption of beverage containers and
24 the payment of handling fees associated therewith, may apply to the
25 Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, in the form and
26 manner prescribed by the secretary, for full reimbursement of the
27 financial loss to the deposit initiator as a result of the overredemption of
28 beverage containers.
29 (c) Nothing in this section shall affect the rate of the handling fee set
30 forth in subsection (d) of section 22a-245 of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
FIN Joint Favorable
SB516 / File No. 701 2

SB516 File No. 701
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. Uncertain - See Below See Below
Potential Cost
Revenue Serv., Dept. GF - Revenue None Minimal
Impact
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the refund value of beverage containers be
reduced from 10 cents to five cents under certain circumstances, results
in (1) a minimal net revenue impact to the General Fund beginning in
FY 28, and (2) a potential cost to the state.
Revenue Impact
Based on currently available data, the redemption rate threshold
established under the bill for calendar year 2026 would be triggered,
thus reducing the bottle deposit amount from 10 cents to five beginning
in FY 28, or after when practicable for the beverage industry to
implement. It is anticipated this would reduce redemption rates below
60% thus increasing the General Fund escheat rate from 5% to 45%.1 The
impact of (1) the decrease in the bottle deposit amount and (2) the
increase in the escheat rate results in a minimal net revenue impact to
the General Fund until such time that the DRS commissioner certifies,
based on irrefutable evidence, that 100% of the beverage containers
1 Prior to the increase in the deposit amount from five cents to 10 cents the quarterly
redemption rate was approximately 50%.
SB516 / File No. 701 3

SB516 File No. 701
redeemed in Connecticut were originally sold here.
Potential Cost Impact
The bill allows deposit initiators that were over-redeemed in FY 25
and FY 26 to apply to the Office of Policy and Management for full
reimbursement for financial losses. This results in a potential cost to the
state.2 It is uncertain what funding, if any, would be available for such
reimbursement.3
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to statewide and individual redemption
rates.
2 As of December 2025, the cumulative negative balance for deposit initiators whose
total withdrawals exceeded deposits was approximately $19.2 million.
3 Section 404 of PA 25-168, AAC The State Budget For The Biennium Ending June 30,
2027, And Making Appropriations Therefor, And Provisions Related To Revenue And
Other Items Implementing The State Budget, provided $1.75 million in grants to over-
redeemed deposit initiators. As of March 31, 2026, approximately $30,500 remains
available.
SB516 / File No. 701 4

SB516 File No. 701
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 516
AN ACT CONCERNING THE REDEMPTION RATE AND REFUND
VALUE OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.